tr: Ayakkabı beden sistemi: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Diğer
de: Schuhgrößensystem: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Systém veľkosti obuvi: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Iné
es: Sistema de tallas de calzado: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; RU; EE. UU.; Otro
th: ระบบการกำหนดขนาดรองเท้า: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; อื่นๆ
vi: Hệ thống kích cỡ giày dép: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Khác
ko: 신발 사이즈 시스템: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; 기타
sv: Storlekssystem för skor: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Övrigt
zh-TW: 鞋款尺寸系統: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; 其他
pt-PT: Sistema de calçado: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Outro
ja: 靴のサイズシステム: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; その他
pt-BR: Sistema de tamanho de calçados: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Outro
ru: Система размеров обуви: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Другое
en: Footwear size system: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Other
lt-LT: Avalynės dydžių sistema: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Kita
nb: Fottøy størrelsessystem: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Annet
zh-CN: 鞋类尺寸系统: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; 其他
sl-SI: Sistem velikosti obutve: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Drugo
da: Størrelsessystem for fodtøj: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; USA; Andet
nl: Schoeisel maatsysteem: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; VK; VS; Overige
cs: Systém velikostí obuvi: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Jiné
hr-HR: Sustav veličina obuće: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Ostalo
fi: Jalkineiden kokojärjestelmä: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Muu
bg-BG: Система за размери на обувки: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Друга
el: Σύστημα μεγέθους υποδημάτων: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Άλλο
pl: System rozmiarów obuwia: AU (Australia); BR (Brazylia); CN (Chiny); EU; JP (Japonia); KR (Korea); MX (Meksyk); UK; US; Inny
fr: Système de pointures: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Autre
ro-RO: Sistemul de dimensiuni al încălțămintei: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Altele
it: Calzature sistema: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Altro
hu: Cipőméret-rendszer: AU; BR; CN; EU; JP; KR; MX; UK; US; Egyéb